Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.250

Appellate review of criminal case.

Upon request of a prosecuting attorney, the attorney general may assume responsibility for the appellate review of a criminal case or assist the prosecuting attorney in the appellate review if the attorney general finds that the case involves fundamental issues affecting the public interest and the administration of criminal justice in this state.

[ 1985 c 251 s 2.]